Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.116

Fees on pull-tab and punchboard sales.

The commission shall charge fees or increased fees on pull-tabs sold over-the-counter and on sales from punchboards and pull-tab devices at levels necessary to assure that the increased revenues are equal or greater to the amount of revenue lost by removing the special tax on coin-operated gambling devices by the 1984 repeal of *RCW 9.46.115.

[ 1985 c 7 s 2; 1984 c 135 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.46.115 was repealed by 1984 c 135 s 1, effective July 1, 1984.

Effective date—1984 c 135: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1984." [ 1984 c 135 s 3.]